Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1218
Specialized program; local governing board; duties.

The local governing board for a specialized program shall:

(1) Organize and supervise the delivery of specialized services within its governance;

(2) Cause such services to be provided;

(3) Report annually to the director regarding the expenditure of funds and the evaluation of specialized services rendered during the preceding year; and

(4) Ensure compliance with the certification and accreditation requirements of section 83-1217 and all applicable rules and regulations of the department.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 18.